North Carolina, session 2025, HB213.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 95-9 reads as rewritten:
"§ 95-9. Employers to post notice of laws.
(a) It shall be the duty of every employer who has five or more employees to keep posted
in a conspicuous place in every room where five or more persons are employed a printed notice
stating the provisions of the law relative to the employment of adult persons and children and the
children, the regulation of hours and hours, working conditions. conditions, and the provisions
of the law relative to veterans' benefits of this State. The Commissioner of Labor shall furnish
the a digital form on its website or a printed form of such notice upon request. A traditional notice
with printed labor laws and a veterans' benefit Quick Response (QR) Code that will link to the
North Carolina Department of Military and Veterans Affairs current year resource webpage may
be offered to those who request it. The digital form notice shall have a digital Quick Response
(QR) Code for labor laws that will link to the North Carolina Department of Labor current year
publications webpage and a digital Quick Response (QR) Code for veterans' benefits that will
link to the North Carolina Department of Military and Veterans Affairs current year resource
webpage, both webpages shall be promptly updated to current State and federal benefit changes,
and will include, at a minimum, information about the following services for veterans:
(1) The Department of Military and Veterans Affairs' contact and website
information for veterans' services.
(2) Benefits and claims.
(3) Employment and training.
(4) Housing assistance, including assistance for homeless veterans.
(5) Requests for military records.
(b) The Department of Labor shall consult with the Department of Military and Veterans
Affairs to create the veterans' benefits and services notice. The Department of Labor and the
North Carolina Department of Military and Veterans Affairs shall make available on its website
a digital notice for voluntary use only to read: "We Support Our Veterans. To learn more about
benefits please scan the QR code." This Quick Response (QR) Code will also link to the North
Carolina Department of Military and Veterans Affairs current year resource webpage."
SECTION 2. This act is effective January 1, 2026.
*H213-v-3*